New York, session 2025-2026, A10028.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The education law is amended by adding a new section 819 to 2 read as follows: 3 § 819. Instruction relating to firearm safety. 1. The commissioner, in 4 consultation with the commissioner of environmental conservation, shall 5 develop curriculum for courses on firearm safety which shall be age 6 appropriate and developed according to the needs and abilities of pupils 7 in grades six through twelve. Such curricula shall be made available to 8 every school in the state. 9 2. The curriculum developed under this section shall include, but not 10 be limited to: 11 (a) Proper usage and handling of firearms. 12 (b) Safe cleaning and maintenance of firearms. 13 (c) Different types of firearms. 14 (d) Safe hunting practices. 15 3. Firearms or ammunition shall not be brought into a school building 16 as part of the firearm safety instruction. 17 4. The board of a school district may provide firearm safety instruc- 18 tion following the curriculum developed under this section as an 19 optional extracurricular class for any pupil in grades six through 20 twelve in the school district or may provide the firearm safety instruc- 21 tion as part of an existing course for the purpose of teaching self-ex- 22 pression and enjoyment of recreational activity. 23 5. Upon request from a pupil or the pupil's parent or legal guardian, 24 the pupil shall be excused, without penalty or loss of academic credit, 25 from attending the firearm safety instruction. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD14460-01-6 A. 10028 2 1 6. A pupil who completes the firearm safety instruction curriculum 2 developed under this section is considered to have completed the hunter 3 safety course required to obtain a hunting license under title seven of 4 article eleven of the environmental conservation law. 5 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.